Louisiana, session 2026, HB511.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:2401.4 and 2401.5 are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2401.4. Law Enforcement Pursuit Safety and Technology Grant Program; creation;
purpose; funding
A. The "Law Enforcement Pursuit Safety and Technology Grant Program"
is hereby created within the Louisiana Commission on Law Enforcement and
Administration of Criminal Justice, hereafter referred to as the "commission". The
purpose of the program is to provide funding assistance to state, parish, and
municipal law enforcement agencies for the acquisition and training related to
technology and devices designed to safely terminate high-speed vehicle pursuits.
B. The commission shall administer the program in accordance with uniform
guidelines promulgated by the commission.
C. Funds may be used for the pursuit intervention training or the purchase
of technology and devices to enhance pursuit safety, including but not limited to:
(1) GPS tracking projectiles.
(2) Vehicle-stopping nets or tethering systems, such as the Grappler.
(3) Remote-controlled tire deflation devices.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 511 ENROLLED
D. The commission is hereby authorized to receive funds, grants, donations,
or other assistance from any source, including federal funds available through the
Highway Safety Improvement Program under 23 U.S.C. 148, the Edward Byrne
Memorial Justice Assistance Grant Program, the National Highway Traffic Safety
Administration, the Homeland Security Grant Program, the Community Oriented
Policing Services Technology and Equipment Program, the Community Policing
Development Microgrants Program, and the Louisiana Department of Transportation
and Development in furtherance of the state's Strategic Highway Safety Plan for the
purposes of this program.
E. The commission shall prioritize grant applications from agencies that have
fully integrated the use of these technologies into their use-of-force and pursuit
policies and that emphasize law enforcement safety by reducing manual deployment
risks.
§2401.5. Pursuit Safety and Officer Technology Fund
A. There is hereby established in the state treasury, as a special fund, the
Pursuit Safety and Officer Technology Fund, hereinafter referred to in this Section
as the "fund".
B. After allocation of monies to the Bond Security and Redemption Fund as
provided in Article VII, Section (9)(B) of the Constitution of Louisiana, the treasurer
shall deposit into the fund monies transferred, appropriated, or dedicated to the fund.
Monies in the fund shall be appropriated by the legislature to the Louisiana
Commission on Law Enforcement and the Administration of Criminal Justice and
shall be used solely for the following purposes:
(1) Provide grants to state, parish, and municipal law enforcement agencies
for the acquisition of pursuit intervention technology, including but not limited to
GPS tracking projectiles, remote-deployment tire deflation devices, and
vehicle-tethering systems.
(2) Provide grants to state, parish, and municipal law enforcement agencies
for the development and implementation of training programs for the safe
deployment of pursuit intervention devices and technology.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 511 ENROLLED
(3) Administrative costs of the Louisiana Commission on Law Enforcement
and the Administration of Criminal Justice associated with the grant program, not to
exceed five percent of the annual fund balance.
C. Monies in the fund shall be invested in the same manner as monies in the
state general fund. Interest earned on investment of monies in the fund shall be
credited to the fund. Unexpended and unencumbered monies in the fund at the end
of the fiscal year shall remain in the fund.
Section 2. This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Sergeant Grant Candies
Officer Safety Act".
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.